Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3806
Kratom product; label; requirements.

A kratom product sold, offered for sale, or introduced into commerce in the State of Nebraska shall have a label on each retail package that clearly and conspicuously provides the following information:

(1) The product is not recommended for use by individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who are pregnant, or who are breastfeeding;

(2) A health care practitioner should be consulted prior to using the product;

(3) The product may be habit-forming;

(4) The following statements: "These statements have not been evaluated by the Food and Drug Administration. This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any disease.";

(5) The name and place of business of the processor;

(6) Directions for use that include a recommended amount of the kratom product per serving that is:

(a) Clearly described on the label for product forms such as capsules, gummies, prepackaged, single-serving units, and similar product forms; or

(b) A clear instruction or a mark on the package or container for beverages or liquids;

(7) A recommended number of servings that can be safely consumed in a twenty-four-hour period;

(8) A listing of the servings per container; and

(9) A listing of kratom alkaloids mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine and other ingredients in the product, including quantitative declarations of the amount per serving of mitragynine.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 6.